Utah statutes.
73-2-10.   Knowledge of waterways and irrigation -- Suggestions as to amendment or enactment of laws.

The state engineer shall become conversant with the waterways of the state and its needs as to irrigation matters; and he shall make such suggestions as to the amendment of existing laws or the enactment of new laws as his information and experience shall suggest.

